Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4050
Licensure required; enforcement.

A person shall not sell, solicit, or negotiate insurance in this state for any class or classes of insurance unless the person is licensed for that line of authority in accordance with the Insurance Producers Licensing Act. A person who sells, solicits, or negotiates insurance in this state for any class of insurance who is not licensed for that line of authority may be restrained by temporary and permanent injunctions.

Laws 2001, LB 51, § 4.